Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-3412
Equipment; responsibility; indemnity, when.

A program shall have sole responsibility for any equipment, such as a global positioning system or other special equipment, that is put in or on a vehicle to monitor or facilitate sharing and shall agree to indemnify and hold harmless the owner for any damage to or theft of such equipment during the sharing period not caused by the owner. A program has the right to seek indemnity from a driver for any loss or damage to such equipment that occurs during the sharing period.

Laws 2024, LB1073, § 12.